California, session 20252026, SB918.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 114259.2 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:114259.2. (a) (1) Passthrough window service openings shall be limited to no more than 216 square inches each, shall not be closer together than 18 inches, and shall be provided with a solid or screened window that is closed when not in use. Screening shall be at least 16 mesh per square inch. The counter surface of the service openings shall be smooth and easily cleanable.(2) A Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a passthrough window service opening of between 216 square inches and 432 square inches may be approved if shall be equipped with an air curtain device or a self-closing device. The counter surface of the service opening shall be smooth and easily cleanable.(3) A Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a passthrough service opening that is larger than 432 square inches may be approved if shall be equipped with both a self-closing device and an air curtain device. The counter surface of the service opening, if applicable, shall be smooth and easily cleanable.(b) A passthrough window or other service opening shall be used specifically for food delivery operations and not as a general entrance or exit for employees or customers.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.